Maryland, session 2025, HB1076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–220.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION, A LANDLORD
MAY ENTER A LEASED PREMISES FOR THE PURPOSE OF:
(1) COMPLETING REPAIRS, MAINTENANCE, MODIFICATIONS,
RENOVATIONS, OR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE LEASED PREMISES;
(2) INSPECTING THE LEASED PREMISES;
(3) SHOWING THE LEASED PREMISES TO PROSPECTIVE OR ACTUAL
PURCHASERS, MORTGAGEES, TENANTS, OR CONTRACTORS;
(4) ENSURING THE PROTECTION AND SAFETY OF THE PROPERTY AND
OCCUPANTS; OR
(5) COMPLETING WORK ORDERED BY A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY; OR
(6) IF APPROPRIATE, RESPONDING TO ANY OTHER WRITTEN
REQUEST OF THE TENANT.
– 1 –

Ch. 564 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEFORE ENTERING A LEASED PREMISES, A LANDLORD SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE TENANT OF THE
LANDLORD’S INTENT TO ENTER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(II) ENTER ONLY BETWEEN THE HOURS OF 9:00 7:00 A.M. AND
5:00 7:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH SATURDAY, OR ANOTHER TIME AGREED ON, IN
WRITING, BY THE TENANT.
(2) A LANDLORD MAY ENTER THE LEASED PREMISES WITHOUT
PROVIDING NOTICE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN THE EVENT OF AN EMERGENCY TO
ENSURE THE IMMINENT PROTECTION OR PRESERVATION OF THE PROPERTY OR,
THE IMMINENT PROTECTION AND SAFETY OF ANY OCCUPANTS, OR THE HEALTH,
SAFETY, AND WELFARE OF OTHER TENANTS AND STAFF.
(C) (1) A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE TENANT
AT LEAST 48 24 HOURS IN ADVANCE OF THE TIME THAT THE LANDLORD INTENDS TO
ENTER THE LEASED PREMISES.
(2) THE NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE DATE AND APPROXIMATE TIME THAT THE LANDLORD
INTENDS TO ENTER; AND
(II) THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE OF ENTRY.
(3) THE NOTICE SHALL BE DELIVERED BY:
(I) IF THE NOTICE IS DELIVERED AT LEAST 48 24 HOURS
BEFORE THE SPECIFIED TIME, FIRST–CLASS MAIL, WITH A CERTIFICATE OF
MAILING;
(II) PAPER NOTICE AFFIXED TO THE DOOR OF THE LEASED
PREMISES; OR
(III) IF ELECTED BY THE TENANT, ELECTRONIC DELIVERY IN AT
LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING FORMS:
1. AN E–MAIL MESSAGE;
2. A TEXT MESSAGE; OR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 564
3. THROUGH AN ELECTRONIC TENANT PORTAL THAT IS
ACCESSIBLE TO THE TENANT AT THE TIME THE NOTICE IS DELIVERED AND THE
SPECIFIED ENTRY TIME.
(4) ELECTRONIC DELIVERY SHALL PROVIDE THE LANDLORD WITH
PROOF OF TRANSMISSION OF THE NOTICE.
(5) A TENANT MAY AGREE IN WRITING TO ALLOW A LANDLORD TO
ENTER THE LEASED PREMISES LESS THAN 48 24 HOURS FROM RECEIPT OF NOTICE.
(D) (1) TO SEEK RELIEF UNDER THIS SECTION, A TENANT SHALL
DEMONSTRATE THAT:
(I) A LANDLORD HAS ENTERED THE LEASED PREMISES IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) A LANDLORD HAS MADE REPEATED DEMANDS FOR ENTRY
THAT ARE NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IN RESPONSE TO AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
COURT MAY ISSUE AN INJUNCTION TO THE LANDLORD, ASSESS APPROPRIATE
DAMAGES AGAINST THE LANDLORD FOR BREACH OF THE TENANT’S COVENANT TO
QUIET ENJOYMENT OF THE LEASED PREMISES, OR BOTH.
(E) A LANDLORD IS LIABLE FOR ANY VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION
COMMITTED BY THE LANDLORD OR AN AGENT ACTING AT THE DIRECTION OF THE
LANDLORD.
(F) IF A TENANT ALLEGES A HOUSING CODE VIOLATION, THE TENANT SHALL
PROVIDE THE LANDLORD ACCESS TO THE LEASED PREMISES WITHIN 48 24 HOURS
AFTER NOTIFYING THE LANDLORD OF THE ALLEGED VIOLATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –